Missouri, session 2026, SB1760.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:

There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or
items stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the
period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:

Section 11.005. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Director's Office, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service................................................ $182,958
Expense and Equipment...................................... 27,770
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 210,728

Personal Service................................................. 164,486
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,197
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 165,683

Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169).......................... 44,008
Total............................................................... $420,419

SB 1760 2


Section 11.010. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General
Assembly provided that the General Assembly shall be notified
of the source of any new funds and the purpose for which they
shall be expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................$2,000,000
From Family Services Donations Fund (1167). ......................... 33,999
Total..............................................................$2,033,999

Section 11.015. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the OA
Information Technology Federal Fund
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................$27,157,127

Section 11.020. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For implementation on the citizen engagement platform of a Medicaid
application providing transparency and two-way
communication for efficient application processing and data
collection as well as additional functionality necessary to
improve efficiency in processing applications for assistance,
provided the department shall procure services in compliance
with Chapter 34, RSMo.
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,413,600
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................2,586,400

For costs to assess existing health data systems and establish a unified,
statewide health data standard and governance approach to
support data sharing and modernization efforts across state
health agencies
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 1,495,000
Total..............................................................$5,495,000

SB 1760 3


Section 11.025. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Human Resources Center, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service................................................ $396,374
Expense and Equipment...................................... 9,919
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 406,293

Personal Service................................................. 215,737
Expense and Equipment...................................... 28,596
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 244,333

Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 28,577
Total............................................................... $679,203

Section 11.030. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the State Technical Assistance Team (STAT)
For the prevention and investigation of child abuse, child neglect, child
sexual abuse, child exploitation/pornography or child fatality
cases, as described in Sections 660.520 to 660.528, RSMo, and
for administrative expenses, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment; and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service...............................................$2,071,660
Expense and Equipment...................................... 223,786
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,295,446

Section 11.035. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit, provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service...............................................$1,991,058

SB 1760 4

Expense and Equipment...................................... 404,161
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,395,219

Personal Service................................................2,469,670
Expense and Equipment...................................... 900,493
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................3,370,163

Expense and Equipment
From Recovery Audit and Compliance Fund (1974)............................ 82,087

Personal Service................................................. 342,361
Expense and Equipment...................................... 141,946
From Medicaid Provider Enrollment Fund (1990). ...................... 484,307
Total..............................................................$6,331,776

Section 11.040. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit
For a case management, provider enrollment, and fraud abuse and
detection system, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,141,709
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 5,858,291
Total..............................................................$7,000,000

Section 11.045. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit
For the design, development, implementation, maintenance, and
operation costs for a Medicaid provider enrollment system
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$5,894,832
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 12,639,235
Total.............................................................$18,534,067


SB 1760 5

Section 11.050. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit
For recovery audit services
Expense and Equipment
From Recovery Audit and Compliance Fund (1974).........................$1,200,000

Section 11.055. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 11.910
Personal Service...............................................$2,349,894
Expense and Equipment...................................... 325,525
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,675,419

Personal Service................................................1,212,919
Expense and Equipment...................................... 233,105
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................1,446,024

Personal Service................................................... 5,246
Expense and Equipment...................................... 317
From Department of Social Services Administrative Trust Fund (1545). ............ 5,563

Personal Service.................................................. 65,736
Expense and Equipment...................................... 750
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169)................................ 66,486

For the centralized inventory system, for reimbursable goods and
services provided by the department, and for related equipment
replacement and maintenance expenses
From Department of Social Services Administrative Trust Fund (1545). ..... 1,200,000
Total..............................................................$5,393,492

Section 11.060. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the Child Welfare Eligibility Unit
For administrative expenses, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment

SB 1760 6

Personal Service................................................ $881,572
Expense and Equipment...................................... 21,300
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 902,872

Personal Service................................................. 779,815
Expense and Equipment...................................... 18,964
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 798,779
Total..............................................................$1,701,651

Section 11.065. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the Compliance Services Unit
For administrative expenses
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $218,288
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146)............................. 178,134
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 255,985
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 130,919

For contracted compliance monitoring and fiscal monitoring services
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................1,031,110
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 578,663
Total..............................................................$2,393,099


Section 11.070. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the payment of fees to contractors who engage in revenue
maximization projects on behalf of the Department of Social
Services and the General Assembly
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................ $750,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 250,000
Total..............................................................$1,000,000


SB 1760 7

Section 11.075. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the receipt and disbursement of refunds and incorrectly deposited
receipts to allow the over-collection of accounts receivables to
be paid back to the recipient, provided twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between federal and other funds
within this section
From Title XIX Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358)........................ $450,000
From FMAP Enhancement Expansion Fund (2466)........................... 450,000
From Federal and Other Fund (1189). ....................................1,500,000
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................5,025,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................... 27,000
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................10,250,000
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120)........................... 369,000
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146)............................. 500,000
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159)........................................................1,500,000
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114). ...................................... 25,000
From Premium Fund (1885). ...........................................5,500,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus Fund (2355). ............. 750,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus 2021 Fund
(2456).................................................... 200,000
Total.............................................................$26,546,000

Section 11.080. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For payments to counties and the City of St. Louis toward the care and
maintenance of each delinquent or dependent child as provided
in Section 211.156, RSMo, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,324,062

Section 11.085. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Legal Services administrative expenses, provided
five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal
service and expense and equipment, and further provided three

SB 1760 8

percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
Personal Service...............................................$3,277,170
Expense and Equipment...................................... 146,300
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,423,470

Personal Service................................................1,850,033
Expense and Equipment...................................... 141,064
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................1,991,097

Personal Service................................................. 749,526
Expense and Equipment...................................... 230,773
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 980,299

Personal Service................................................. 719,349
Expense and Equipment...................................... 91,158
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120)........................... 810,507

Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169).......................... 178,880
Total..............................................................$7,384,253

Section 11.090. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Legal Services
For permanency attorneys and permanency attorney contracted
services, including reunification, guardianship, adoption, or
termination of parental rights, for children in the care, custody,
or involved with the Children’s Division, provided twenty five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from expense and
equipment to personal service, and further provided fifty
percent (50%) flexibility is allowed from personal service to
expense and equipment, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420,
11.425, 11.435, 11.440, 11.465, 11.475, and 11.480
Personal Service...............................................$3,599,951
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,386,211
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................5,986,162

SB 1760 9


Personal Service................................................1,802,820
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,415,506
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................3,218,326

Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 252,379

Personal Service
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120)............................ 67,045

Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169)................................ 14,061

For Title IV-E reimbursements to counties, the City of St. Louis, and
other organizations who receive public dollars for the legal
representation of parents and children in juvenile or family
courts
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 600,000

For non-recurring adoption or legal guardianship expenses related to
permanency, including but not limited to: reasonable and
necessary adoption fees, court costs, attorney fees and other
expenses which are directly related to the legal adoption or legal
guardianship
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,019,345
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 826,778
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 208,177

For a program to provide legal representation for parents of children
who are the subject of child abuse and neglect investigations
under Chapter 210 and potential court proceedings under
Chapter 211
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 150,000
Total.............................................................$13,342,273

SB 1760 10


Section 11.095. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Legal Services
For a not-for-profit organization to provide legal assistance for kinship
placements with non-contested guardianship cases in a county
with more than seven hundred thousand but fewer than eight
hundred thousand inhabitants, and a county with more than two
hundred thirty thousand but fewer than two hundred sixty
thousand inhabitants, and a county with more than one hundred
thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand
but fewer than six thousand inhabitants, and a county with more
than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty
thousand inhabitants, and with a county seat with more than
nine thousand but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants, and
in a county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than
twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than nine thousand but fewer than twelve thousand five
hundred inhabitants, and in a county with more than one
hundred fifty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants, and in a county with more than forty thousand but
fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than ten thousand but fewer than fourteen thousand
inhabitants, and in a county with more than seventy thousand
but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants, and in a county with
more than fourteen thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand
seven hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than three thousand but fewer than four thousand five hundred
fifty inhabitants, to help children remain safely with kinship
caregivers and prevent the need for foster care placement
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $100,000

Section 11.100. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service...............................................$2,697,796
Expense and Equipment...................................... 70,690
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,768,486

SB 1760 11


Personal Service................................................3,361,874
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,511,919
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................8,873,793

Personal Service.................................................. 51,137
Expense and Equipment...................................... 501,513
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 552,650

Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169).......................... 657,029
Total.............................................................$12,851,958

Section 11.105. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the income maintenance field staff and operations, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
Personal Service..............................................$36,973,636
Expense and Equipment...................................... 10,015,498
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................46,989,134

Personal Service...............................................36,255,055
Expense and Equipment...................................... 20,983,776
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................57,238,831

Personal Service................................................. 434,233
Expense and Equipment...................................... 95,138
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 529,371

Personal Service................................................1,037,345
Expense and Equipment...................................... 27,924
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275).................................. 1,065,269
Total............................................................$105,822,605

Section 11.110. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

SB 1760 12

For the Income Maintenance (IM) Call Center
For state operated and contracted call center administrative and
operational expenses, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between subsections within this section
Personal Service...............................................$8,635,045
Expense and Equipment...................................... 7,343,554
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................15,978,599

Personal Service................................................8,600,236
Expense and Equipment...................................... 8,759,927
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................17,360,163

Personal Service................................................. 552,291
Expense and Equipment...................................... 245,951
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 798,242
Total.............................................................$34,137,004

Section 11.115. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For public acute care hospital partnerships to assist with eligibility
determinations for Medicaid and CHIP
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 1,000,000
Total..............................................................$2,000,000

Section 11.120. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For income maintenance and child support staff training, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $118,118
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 97,674
Total............................................................... $215,792

Section 11.125. To the Department of Social Services

SB 1760 13

For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit organization established in 2018 to provide benefits
and services as provided by the Refugee Act of 1980 as
amended; whose mission and vision is promoting the well-being
and inclusion of refugees by resourcing and coordinating
resettlement programs across the state; and subcontracts or
partners with local refugee resettlement programs throughout
the state to ensure access to resources needed to help
populations serviced rebuild their lives
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................$37,904,538

Section 11.130. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Electronic Benefit Transfers (EBT) system
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,086,957
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 482,970
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 100,000
Total..............................................................$1,669,927

Section 11.135. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) program
For administrative expenses
Personal Service................................................ $190,270
Expense and Equipment...................................... 11,543
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 201,813

Personal Service................................................. 152,464
Expense and Equipment...................................... 11,543
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 164,007
Total............................................................... $365,820

Section 11.140. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) program

SB 1760 14

For contracted vendor costs
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$6,413,100
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 6,413,100
Total.............................................................$12,826,200

Section 11.145. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Missouri SuN Bucks Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer
(EBT) program benefit disbursements
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................$51,500,000

Section 11.150. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the receipt of funds from the Polk County and Bolivar Charitable
Trust for the exclusive benefit and use of the Polk County
Office
From Family Services Donations Fund (1167). .............................. $10,000

Section 11.155. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For contractor, hardware, and other costs associated with planning,
development, and implementation of a Family Assistance
Management Information System (FAMIS), provided, three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $571,908
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................... 73,422
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 400,000
Total..............................................................$1,045,330

Section 11.160. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For Missouri Eligibility Determination and Enrollment System
(MEDES), provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is

SB 1760 15

allowed between Sections 11.155 and 11.160, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 11.910
For the design, development, implementation, maintenance and
operation costs of the Medicaid and Children’s Health
Insurance Program (CHIP) eligibility categories under the
Modified Adjusted Gross Income (MAGI) based methodology
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative
costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,179,105
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................25,179,260
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................1,300,007
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)......................................1,000,004

For the design, development, and implementation costs for
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP)
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................6,093,538
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................7,652,690
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................2,000,000

For the design, development, and implementation costs for Temporary
Assistance (TA)
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative costs
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 200,000

For the expenses for the independent verification and validation
(IV&V) services
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 352,983
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 970,537

For the expenses related to the enterprise content management (ECM)
system
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 453,867

SB 1760 16

From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................2,227,500

For the expenses related to the project management office (PMO)
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,359,631
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 2,661,566
Total.............................................................$53,630,688

Section 11.165. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For costs associated with updates to the Income Maintenance Eligibility
System and additional resources necessary to comply with
federal eligibility requirements and program integrity
requirements enacted through federal budget reconciliation
legislation provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.160 and 11.165
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$22,582,876
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................41,809,159
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 217,878
Total.............................................................$64,609,913

Section 11.170. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For income maintenance eligibility system updates and additional
resources to implement H.R. 1
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$17,246,497
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 32,346,763
9Total................................................................$49,593,260


Section 11.175. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Food Nutrition Program

SB 1760 17
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).............................................................$7,031,849


Section 11.180. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For Missouri Work Programs
For a century-old viable non-profit entity located in a city not within a
county that annually serves over one hundred thousand clients
regionally assisting participants to become successful
employees and that serves economically disadvantaged males
and females to find jobs and have the opportunity to earn livable
wages
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................$1,000,000

For the purpose of funding a program in a city not within a county to
foster healthy relationships by strengthening families and
reducing the rates of absentee fathers through employment
placement, job readiness, and employer retention skills
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 1,000,000
Total..............................................................$2,000,000

Section 11.185. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization headquartered in a city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and headquartered in more
than one county that provides training in the trade of pet
grooming to break through generational poverty
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $995,354
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 995,354
Total..............................................................$1,990,708

Section 11.190. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization located in any county with more than one
million inhabitants that provides youth and their family with
mentorship as well as virtual or in-person educational
opportunities relating to college preparedness, workforce
development, and character preparation to foster academic
success

SB 1760 18
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................. $330,500

Section 11.195. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) benefits and
Temporary Assistance (TA) Diversion transitional benefits
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,946,121
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................11,718,245

For the purpose of funding a joint effort between a program in any city
not within a county that builds strong families and vibrant
communities by providing hope, comprehensive services, and
meaningful opportunities that exemplifies the cultural and
artistic traditions of people in Africa, the Caribbean and the
Americas and a century-old viable non-profit entity located in a
city not within a county that annually serves over one hundred
thousand clients regionally assisting participants to become
successful employees and that serves economically
disadvantaged males and females to find jobs and have the
opportunity to earn livable wages
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 250,000

For a nonprofit organization headquartered in a city with more than one
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants whose mission is to feed the world through
children's feeding initiatives, community outreaches, disaster
response, and strategic program partners
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 2,000,000
Total.............................................................$16,914,366

Section 11.200. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a healthy marriage and fatherhood initiative
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................$1,250,000

Section 11.205. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For supplemental payments to aged or disabled persons
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ $6,120

SB 1760 19

Section 11.210. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For nursing care payments to aged, blind, or disabled persons, and for
personal funds to recipients of Supplemental Nursing Care
payments as required by Section 208.030, RSMo, provided
thirty-five percent (35%) flexibility is allowed from Section
11.210 to 11.745
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$22,344,440

Section 11.215. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For Blind Pension and supplemental payments to blind persons,
provided that the Department of Social Services, whenever it
calculates a new estimated rate or rates for the Blind Pension
and/or supplemental payments to blind persons for the
upcoming fiscal year, shall transmit the new estimated rate or
rates, as well as the accompanying assumptions and calculations
used to create the new estimated rate or rates, to the following
organizations: Missouri Council for the Blind, National
Federation of the Blind of Missouri, and the State Rehabilitation
Council
From Blind Pension Fund (1621). .....................................$44,838,112

Section 11.220. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the administration of blind services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service...............................................$1,093,800
Expense and Equipment...................................... 114,927
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,208,727
Personal Service................................................4,113,351
Expense and Equipment...................................... 754,915
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 4,868,266
Total..............................................................$6,076,993

Section 11.225. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

SB 1760 20
For services for the visually impaired, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,298,211
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................5,657,946
From Family Services Donations Fund (1167). ............................... 99,995
From Blindness Education Screening and Treatment Program Fund
(1892).................................................... 349,325
Total..............................................................$7,405,477

Section 11.230. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For business enterprise programs for the blind
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................$44,603,034

Section 11.235. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Child Support Enforcement field staff and operations, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 11.910
Personal Service...............................................$3,681,668
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,587,989
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................6,269,657

Personal Service...............................................19,803,965
Expense and Equipment...................................... 7,770,516
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................27,574,481

Personal Service................................................2,457,642
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,396,390
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169).......................... 4,854,032
Total.............................................................$38,698,170

Section 11.240. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Child Support Enforcement Call Center
For state operated call center administrative and operational expenses
Personal Service................................................ $887,742

SB 1760 21

Expense and Equipment...................................... 614,885
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,502,627

Personal Service................................................1,694,015
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,297,503
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................2,991,518

Personal Service................................................. 129,519
Expense and Equipment...................................... 95,844
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169).......................... 225,363
Total..............................................................$4,719,508

Section 11.245. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Family Support Payment Center
Personal Service................................................. $72,799
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,470,006
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................3,542,805

Personal Service.................................................. 35,931
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,462,900
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169).......................... 1,498,831
Total..............................................................$5,041,636

Section 11.250. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For reimbursements to counties and the City of St. Louis and
contractual agreements with local governments providing child
support services, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,240,491
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................14,886,582
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169).......................... 800,212
Total.............................................................$17,927,285

Section 11.255. To the Department of Social Services

SB 1760 22

For the Family Support Division
For reimbursements to the federal government for federal Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families payments, refunds of bonds,
refunds of support payments or overpayments, and distributions
to families
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................$36,500,000
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753)................................ 6,000,000
Total.............................................................$42,500,000

Section 11.260. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Department of Social Services Federal Fund
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753).................................... $955,000

Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Child Support Enforcement Fund
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753).................................... $245,000

Section 11.265. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Office of Workforce and Community Initiatives
For administrative expenses
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $176,390
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................1,927,955
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 1,068,061
Total..............................................................$3,172,406

Section 11.270. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For grants and contracts to Community Partnerships and other
community initiatives and related expenses, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... $78,307

SB 1760 23

From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................7,525,492

For the Missouri Mentoring Partnership
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 935,000

For a program for adolescents with the goal of preventing teen
pregnancies
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 400,000
Total..............................................................$8,938,799

Section 11.275. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Missouri Work Assistance Program Unit
For Work Assistance Programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,855,554
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................12,017,755

For the Missouri SkillUp Program
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................4,672,471
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................5,469,104

For the attendance of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
recipients at adult high schools as designated by the Department
of Elementary and Secondary Education
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................5,100,000

For the attendance of low-income individuals at adult high schools as
designated by the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,000,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................6,400,000

For the purpose of providing matching funds for a new adult high
school awarded by the state serving a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county

SB 1760 24

From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ..................................1,000,000

For child care at adult high school locations
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,510,000

For Jobs for America’s Graduates
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................4,500,000

For a comprehensive counseling and solution generation service that
focuses on a multi-year journey for high school students from
initial training to full-time employment with pre-identified entry
level jobs that drive the program’s training while earning a
degree relating to information technology, provided that the
service is designed to assist with environmental hurdles and
with students receiving accredited course credit from
institutions for higher education in the state of Missouri, and
further provided that the service includes a multi-year, wrap
around support infrastructure for each student that extends from
the student’s acceptance into the program through full time
employment and continues until the student completes a degree,
if so requested by the program participant, also known as
HyperCare
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,250,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 1,750,000
Total.............................................................$47,524,884

Section 11.280. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit program located in a city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county that
assists high school graduates, young adults, and career-seeking
individuals in obtaining post-secondary education and job
training and teaching the imperative career-skill and work ethic
necessary to become successful employees
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................. $250,000

Section 11.285. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

SB 1760 25

For support to Food Banks’ effort to provide services and food to low-
income individuals
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ...............$10,000,000

For an evidence-based program through a school-based early warning
and response system that improves student attendance,
behavior, and course performance in reading and math by
identifying the root causes for student absenteeism, classroom
disruption, and course failure
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................1,500,000

For after school support programs
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................1,000,000

For out of school support programs
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................2,000,000

For a century-old viable non-profit entity located in a city not within a
county that annually serves over one hundred thousand clients
regionally in efforts to deescalate violence and offer conflict
mediation and connects neighborhood residents with the
necessary viable resources and services, in an effort to reduce
crime, violence, and to improve the quality of life
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 500,000

For a nonprofit organization serving youth for over twenty years that
enables young people to reach their full potential as productive,
caring, responsible citizens by providing a club experience,
including after school and summer programs that assures
success located in any city with more than sixteen thousand but
fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and that is the county
seat of a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than
fifty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,200,000

For a nonprofit organization founded in 2016 located in a city with
more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in
more than one county, that is providing access to fresh,

SB 1760 26

affordable and healthy foods to over 250,000 local residents
experiencing food insecurity
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 100,000
Total.............................................................$16,300,000

Section 11.290. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For out of school enrichment initiatives
Program Distribution
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ..........$7,000,000


Section 11.295. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For alternatives to abortion services, including the provision of diapers
and other infant hygiene products to women who qualify for
alternative to abortion services, provided that if the Department
grants or allocates funds to certain not-for-profit organizations
or regions of the state that are unused or anticipated to be
unused, then the Department shall redistribute such funds to
other not-for-profit organizations or regions of the state to
ensure that all the funds appropriated are available to serve
women who qualify for alternatives to abortion services, and
further provided that the Department shall not limit the amount
that can be expended per client
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,033,561
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................... 50,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................10,300,000

For the alternatives to abortion public awareness program, including
assistance to contractors and subcontractors with the
Department for alternatives to abortion services, to help
alternatives to abortion agencies reach pregnant women at risk
for having abortions when such agencies are blocked or in any
other way suppressed by any search engine, social media
platform, or digital advertising network
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 550,000

SB 1760 27

Total.............................................................$12,933,561

Section 11.300. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For grants to organizations that promote and facilitate adoptions,
maternity homes, diaper banks, and organizations providing
material support and other assistance to individuals facing an
unintended pregnancy to help those individuals give birth to
their unborn children
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,000,000

Section 11.305. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a grant to an organization located in a city with more than thirty-six
thousand five hundred but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants
that promotes and facilitates adoptions, maternity homes,
material support and other assistance to individuals facing an
unintended pregnancy to help those individuals give birth to
their unborn children
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $250,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 250,000
Total............................................................... $500,000

Section 11.310. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit located in county with more than one million
inhabitants and founded in 2015 for substance abuse treatment,
family support services, access to healthy foods and adequate
shelter
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).................. $500,000

Section 11.315. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization founded in 2017 to open a cooperatively
owned grocery store that will provide locally grown, fresh
produce from state farmers, and other locally sourced products
and meats located in any county with more than one million
inhabitants

SB 1760 28
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $250,000

Section 11.320. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For community services programs provided by Community Action
Agencies or other not-for-profit organizations under the
provisions of the Community Services Block Grant
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................$23,637,056

Section 11.325. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization located in a county with more than thirty
thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than
thirteen thousand inhabitants providing essential resources and
support to needful and vulnerable individuals who cannot
adequately help themselves
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $125,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 125,000
Total............................................................... $250,000

Section 11.330. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Food Distribution Program, the receipt and disbursement of
Donated Food Program payments and for the Local Food
Purchase Assistance Cooperative Program
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................$6,777,682

Section 11.335. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program, provided the
eligible household income does not exceed one hundred and
fifty percent (150%) of the federal poverty level or sixty percent
(60%) of the state median income (SMI)
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).....................................................$101,620,002

Section 11.340. To the Department of Social Services

SB 1760 29
For the Family Support Division
For grants to not-for profit organizations for services and programs to
assist victims of domestic violence, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................3,000,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................1,600,000

For emergency shelter services to assist victims of domestic violence
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 562,137
Total..............................................................$9,162,137

Section 11.345. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Victims of Crime Act (VOCA) Unit
For the administrative expenses of the Victims of Crime Act program
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $27,827

Personal Service................................................. 286,501
Expense and Equipment...................................... 100,049
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146)............................. 386,550

For training and technical assistance expenses for the Victims of Crime
Act program
Expense and Equipment
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146)........................ 500,000
Total............................................................... $914,377

Section 11.350. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Office of Workforce & Community Initiatives
For the Victims of Crime Act (VOCA) Unit
For grants to not-for-profit organizations for services and programs to
assist victims of crime
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146)..........................$49,331,537

Section 11.355. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

SB 1760 30
For grants to not-for-profit organizations for services and programs to
assist victims of sexual assault, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,750,000

Section 11.360. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
Administrative expenses, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Expense and Equipment
Personal Service...............................................$1,999,971
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,738,275
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,738,246

Personal Service................................................1,915,795
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,031,094
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................2,946,889

Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 944,470

Expense and Equipment
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120)...................... 55,944
Total..............................................................$7,685,549

Section 11.365. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Residential Program Unit
Personal Service...............................................$1,399,932
Expense and Equipment...................................... 158,212
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,558,144

Personal Service................................................. 573,659
Expense and Equipment...................................... 22,589
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 596,248
Total..............................................................$2,154,392

Section 11.370. To the Department of Social Services

SB 1760 31
For the Children’s Division
For the Child Abuse and Neglect Hotline Unit
For administrative expenses, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service...............................................$5,467,887
Expense and Equipment...................................... 163,666
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$5,631,553

Section 11.375. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
from Section 11.360 to 11.355, and further provided that fifty
percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.360,
11.370, and 11.375, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
For the Children’s Division field staff and operations administrative
expenses
Personal Service..............................................$45,168,617
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,098,188
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................47,266,805

Personal Service...............................................42,952,511
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,192,497
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................46,145,008

Personal Service...............................................14,812,919
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,818,397
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................16,631,316

Personal Service.................................................. 97,411
Expense and Equipment...................................... 35,558
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)....................................... 132,969

For recruitment and retention services
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 613,496
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 550,504

SB 1760 32


For the expansion of a foster care portal software that can be accessed
by children’s division caseworkers, licensed foster families,
foster care licensure applicants, parents or guardians of children
in foster care, and other key parties to ensure streamlined
communication and information sharing
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 750,000
Total............................................................$112,090,098

Section 11.380. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For Psychotropic Medication Reviews
For administration to monitor and track prescribed and administered
psychotropic medications to children in the custody of the
Children's Division, assist in the collection of medical records,
ensure informed consent of family members, provide secondary
reviews to prevent excessive dosages, and administer pre-
service and annual training to foster care case management staff
and resource providers
Personal Service................................................ $250,134
Expense and Equipment...................................... 45,768
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 295,902

Personal Service.................................................. 72,014
Expense and Equipment...................................... 13,177
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................... 85,191

Personal Service.................................................. 36,007
Expense and Equipment...................................... 6,588
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 42,595
Total............................................................... $423,688

Section 11.385. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For tuition assistance
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $77,000


SB 1760 33
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 231,000
Total............................................................... $308,000

Section 11.390. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For diligent search for relative placements
Personal Service................................................ $749,220
Expense and Equipment...................................... 150,906
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 900,126

Personal Service................................................. 301,607
Expense and Equipment...................................... 74,559
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 376,166
Total..............................................................$1,276,292

Section 11.395. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For administrative expenses of the Family Centered Services (FCS)
program, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and
further provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 11.375, 11.395, and 11.400
Personal Service...............................................$2,697,320
Expense and Equipment...................................... 170,859
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,868,179

Personal Service................................................. 805,879
Expense and Equipment...................................... 65,681
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 871,560
Total..............................................................$3,739,739

Section 11.400. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Team Decision Making (TDM) administrative expenses,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further

SB 1760 34
provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.375, 11.395, and 11.400
Personal Service...............................................$2,730,173
Expense and Equipment...................................... 174,962
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,905,135

Personal Service................................................. 842,595
Expense and Equipment...................................... 65,695
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 908,290
Total..............................................................$3,813,425

Section 11.405. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the development and integration of a new comprehensive child
welfare information system
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$6,345,000
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................6,545,000
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .............................. 4,888,153
Total.............................................................$17,778,153

Section 11.410. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Children's Division staff training, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
For administrative staff expenses
Personal Service................................................. $55,294
Expense and Equipment...................................... 12,531
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 67,825

Personal Service.................................................. 55,295
Expense and Equipment...................................... 12,531
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................... 67,826

Personal Service.................................................. 12,288
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,786
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................... 15,074


SB 1760 35
For contracted training expenses
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,087,513
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 590,243
Total..............................................................$1,828,481

Section 11.415. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For a statewide specialist focused on prevention and response to sex
trafficking and sexual exploitation of children and for services
for child victims, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal services and expense and equipment
Personal Service................................................. $63,586
Expense and Equipment...................................... 7,053
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 70,639

Personal Service.................................................. 37,345
Expense and Equipment...................................... 4,141
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 41,486
Total............................................................... $112,125

Section 11.420. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Birth Match Program as set forth in Section, 210.156 RSMo.
Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................. $110,755

Program Distribution
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 558,065
Total............................................................... $668,820


Section 11.425. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420, 11.425,
11.435, 11.440, 11.465, 11.475, and 11.480, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 11.910

SB 1760 36

For children’s treatment services including, but not limited to, home
based services, day treatment services, preventive services,
family reunification services, or intensive in-home services
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$15,268,036
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................9,796,892
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................... 50,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 425,286

For crisis care
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 2,316,000
Total.............................................................$27,856,214

Section 11.430. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For court ordered drug testing
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $878,763
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 318,924
Total..............................................................$1,197,687

Section 11.435. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For foster care placement special expenses, respite services, and
transportation expenses; expenses related to training of foster
parents provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455,
11.460, 11.485, 11.495 and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,559,911
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 952,323
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................1,052,169

For awards to licensed community-based foster care and adoption
recruitment programs
From Foster Care and Adoptive Parents Recruitment and Retention Fund
(1979).................................................... 15,000
Total..............................................................$5,579,403

SB 1760 37

Section 11.440. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For a foster care ministry organization that provides resources and
training to help parents provide a temporary or forever home for
a child in foster care through in-home coaching, mentoring
foster families on a regular basis, and maintaining a relationship
with the foster family to ensure success and stability for the
child
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $250,000

Section 11.445. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For foster care maintenance payments, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435,
11.445, 11.455, 11.460, 11.485, 11.495 and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$53,077,630
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................20,500,957
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................20,314,073
From Alternative Care Trust Fund (1905).............................. 2,000,000
Total.............................................................$95,892,660

Section 11.450. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For room and board expenses for children placed in a Therapeutic
Foster Care (TFC) house setting
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,566,746
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 1,902,621
Total..............................................................$5,469,367

Section 11.455. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For room and board expenses for children placed in Qualified
Residential Treatment Program designated facilities, provided
seventy-five percent (75%) flexibility is allowed between
subsections within this section, and further provided ten percent

SB 1760 38

(10%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.425,
11.435, 11.445, 11.455, 11.460, 11.485, 11.495 and 11.500.
For placements in a Qualified Residential Treatment Program/non-
Institution for Mental Disease (QRTP/non-IMD) designated
facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$16,431,325
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................5,840,312

For placements in Qualified Residential Treatment Programs/Institution
for Mental Disease (QRTP/IMD) designated facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................5,028,471
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 841,752
Total.............................................................$28,141,860

Section 11.460. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For residential treatment placements and therapeutic treatment services;
and for the diversion of children from inpatient psychiatric
treatment and services provided through comprehensive,
expedited permanency systems of care for children and families,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455, 11.460,
11.485, 11.495 and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$22,594,667
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................7,310,026
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 13,351,973
Total.............................................................$43,256,666

Section 11.465. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For contractual payments for expenses related to training of foster
parents
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $603,513
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 372,934

SB 1760 39
Total............................................................... $976,447


Section 11.470. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For foster parent support
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,208,037
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 1,246,315
Total..............................................................$5,454,352


Section 11.475. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For costs associated with attending post-secondary education including,
but not limited to tuition, books, fees, room and board for
current or former foster youth, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $188,848
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................1,050,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 450,000
Total..............................................................$1,688,848

Section 11.480. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For comprehensive case management contracts through community
based organizations as described in Section 210.112, RSMo.;
the purpose of these contracts shall be to provide a system of
care for children living in foster care, independent living, or
residential care settings; services eligible under this provision
may include, but are not limited to, case management, foster
care, residential treatment, intensive in-home services, family
reunification services, and specialized recruitment and training
of foster care families, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$35,251,584
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund

SB 1760 40
(1610).................................................... 21,685,931
Total.............................................................$56,937,515

Section 11.485. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For adoption subsidy payments, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between subsections within this section, and further
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455, 11.460,
11.485, 11.495 and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$54,682,297
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................52,523,879
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................14,439,396

For guardianship subsidy payments, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between subsections within this section,
and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455,
11.460, 11.485, 11.495 and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................19,947,541
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................15,798,651
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ............. 11,860,598
Total............................................................$169,252,362

Section 11.490. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For kinship navigator services
Program Distribution
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).............................................................. $372,318


Section 11.495. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.405, 11.420, 11.425,
11.435, 11.440, 11.465, 11.475, and 11.480
For Family Resource Centers

SB 1760 41
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$10,403,564
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................14,383,316
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 989,075

For additional Behavioral Intervention Services in areas of need
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 900,000
Total.............................................................$26,675,955

Section 11.500. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For independent living placements and transitional living services,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455, 11.460,
11.485, 11.495 and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,947,584
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 4,171,219
Total..............................................................$6,118,803

Section 11.505. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For Regional Child Assessment Centers, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,249,475
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................1,700,000
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275).................................. 501,048
Total..............................................................$4,450,523

Section 11.510. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For Regional Child Assessment Centers
For services and programs administered through the statewide
association of Regional Child Assessment Centers aimed at
preventing and combating the commercial sexual exploitation of
children
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $500,000

SB 1760 42


Section 11.515. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For residential placement payments to counties for children in the
custody of juvenile courts
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................ $175,000

Section 11.520. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For Court Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) IV-E allowable
training costs
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................ $150,000

Section 11.525. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Grant and Children’s
Justice Act Grant
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................$1,251,341

Section 11.530. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For payments to one or more contractors to assist the Division with
application and administration of benefits on behalf of a child or
youth and to establish and administer accounts for a child or
youth which include but not limited to a special needs trust, a
pooled special needs trust, an ABLE account, or any other trust
account
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,356,992
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 507,008
Total..............................................................$1,864,000

Section 11.535. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For transactions involving personal funds of children to: transfer funds
to accounts set up for the child; to make payments directly to

SB 1760 43
the child; to return the funds to the corresponding funding
agency; to fund "Unmet needs", needs for which the division is
not required by law to provide financial support; or dispose of
the funds as otherwise required by law
From Alternative Care Trust Fund (1905)................................$14,000,000

Section 11.540. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Youth Services
For the Central Office and regional offices, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service...............................................$1,104,048
Expense and Equipment...................................... 81,097
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,185,145

Personal Service................................................. 262,539
Expense and Equipment...................................... 13,855
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................... 276,394

Personal Service................................................. 984,541
Expense and Equipment...................................... 86,779
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................1,071,320

Expense and Equipment
From Youth Services Treatment Fund (1843)........................... 999
Total..............................................................$2,533,858

Section 11.545. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Youth Services
For treatment services, including foster care and contractual payments,
provided up to $500,000 can be used for juvenile court
diversion, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between federal funds, and further provided five percent (5%)
percent flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment; and further provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service..............................................$25,775,382
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,095,642
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................26,871,024

Personal Service................................................5,257,097

SB 1760 44

Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,065,899
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ...................................8,322,996

Personal Service................................................1,149,407
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,125,033
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................2,274,440

Personal Service...............................................13,190,742
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,514,715
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). ................14,705,457

Personal Service................................................3,999,304
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,854,832
From Department of Social Services Educational Improvement Fund
(1620)........................................................7,854,136

Personal Service................................................. 178,072
Expense and Equipment...................................... 9,106
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)....................................... 187,178

Expense and Equipment
From Youth Services Products Fund (1764)................................... 5,000

For overtime to non-exempt state employees and/or for paying
otherwise authorized personal service expenditures in lieu of
such overtime payments; non-exempt state employees identified
by Section 105.935, RSMo., will be paid first with any
remaining funds to be used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,133,414

For payment distribution of Social Security benefits received on behalf
of youth in care
From Division of Youth Services Child Benefits Fund (1727).............. 200,000
Total.............................................................$61,553,645

Section 11.550. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Youth Services

SB 1760 45
For incentive payments to counties for community-based treatment
programs for youth, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,479,486
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)............................... 500,000
Total..............................................................$3,979,486

Section 11.600. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For administrative services, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service...............................................$5,115,492
Expense and Equipment...................................... 6,462,684
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................11,578,176

Personal Service................................................9,450,170
Expense and Equipment...................................... 14,086,537
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................23,536,707

Personal Service................................................. 555,338
Expense and Equipment...................................... 55,553
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114). ..................................... 610,891

Personal Service................................................. 528,593
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,988,041
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120)..........................6,516,634

Personal Service................................................. 135,943
Expense and Equipment...................................... 232,708
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142)......................... 368,651

Personal Service.................................................. 34,086
Expense and Equipment...................................... 356
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144)........................ 34,442

Personal Service................................................. 113,122
Expense and Equipment...................................... 10,281
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271)........................... 123,403


SB 1760 46

Personal Service................................................. 566,877
Expense and Equipment...................................... 41,385
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)....................................... 608,262

Personal Service.................................................. 57,920
Expense and Equipment...................................... 425,372
From Ground Emergency Medical Transport Fund (1422)...................... 483,292

Expense and Equipment
From Life Sciences Research Trust Fund (1763). .............................. 3,000

Personal Service
From Missouri Rx Plan Fund (1779)....................................... 443,129

Personal Service.................................................. 23,682
Expense and Equipment...................................... 128,466
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958).......... 152,148
Total.............................................................$44,458,735

Section 11.605. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For clinical services management related to the administration of the
MO HealthNet Pharmacy fee-for-service and managed care
programs and administration of the Missouri Rx Plan, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 11.910
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $450,191
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................2,214,032
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114). ..................................... 497,648
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120)........................... 924,911
From Missouri Rx Plan Fund (1779).................................. 62,947
Total..............................................................$4,149,729

Section 11.610. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For MO HealthNet Transformation initiatives
Personal Service................................................ $447,214

SB 1760 47
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,609,509
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,056,723

Personal Service................................................. 449,717
Expense and Equipment...................................... 7,410,465
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 7,860,182
Total..............................................................$9,916,905

Section 11.615. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
From Rural Health Transformation Fund (1125)..........................$216,276,818

Section 11.620. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the MO HealthNet Data Management Office administrative
expenses
Personal Service................................................ $225,394
Expense and Equipment...................................... 9,541
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 234,935

Personal Service................................................. 453,477
Expense and Equipment...................................... 23,632
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 477,109
Total............................................................... $712,044

Section 11.625. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For fees associated with third-party collections and other revenue
maximization cost avoidance fees
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................$12,200,000
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120)...................... 12,200,000
Total.............................................................$24,400,000

Section 11.630. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Missouri Medicaid Information System (MMIS)

SB 1760 48

For the operation of the information systems, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within this
section, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$35,756,482
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................134,900,001
From Uncompensated Care Fund (1108).................................... 430,000
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)......................................1,591,687

For the operation of the Business Intelligence Solution – Enterprise
Data Warehouse (BIS-EDW)
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,991,593
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................7,770,710

For the operation of the Beneficiary Support and Premiums Collections
Solution and Services (BSPC) – Enrollment Broker
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,166,137
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)........................................................4,764,421

For the operation of the Clinical Management Services and Pharmacy
Claims and Prior Authorization (CMSP)
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................5,428,027
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................15,557,641

For the operation of the pharmacy system and support services -
Pharmacy Solution
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,477,652
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................12,567,081


SB 1760 49

For the operation of the Managed Care Contract Management Tool
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 688,826
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 5,833,540
Total............................................................$231,923,798

Section 11.635. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the purpose of supporting the transformation of any or all of the
state's existing Health Information Exchanges into a Health
Data Utility by providing funds to enhance the existing HIE
infrastructure for the purpose of data analysis focused on
supporting MO HealthNet. Data analytics provided through the
HIE(s) shall provide analysis to MO HealthNet and members
focused on enhancing care delivery and system efficiency in the
MO HealthNet program and improving health care delivery and
outcomes in under-served communities. All HIEs shall be
required to maintain strict compliance with all patient privacy
protections under HIPAA and any other applicable state or
federal laws
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$5,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 45,000,000
Total.............................................................$50,000,000

Section 11.640. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Money Follows the Person Program
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).......................................................$1,532,549

Section 11.700. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
For pharmaceutical payments under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program, professional fees for pharmacists, and for a
comprehensive chronic care risk management program,

SB 1760 50
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this
subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730,
11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825,
11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$114,517,493
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................892,287,509
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114). ..................................260,835,622
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120)..........................4,217,574
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144).....................35,376,122
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)......................................3,543,350
From Premium Fund (1885). ...........................................3,800,000

For Medicare Part D Clawback payments, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 384,889,010
Total.......................................................... $1,699,466,680

Section 11.705. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the purpose of funding pharmaceutical payments under the
Missouri Rx Plan authorized by Sections 208.780 through
208.798, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,385,332
From Missouri Rx Plan Fund (1779).................................. 1,188,774
Total..............................................................$2,574,106

Section 11.710. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance payments as provided by law
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................$37,436,100
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144).................. 20,563,900
Total.............................................................$58,000,000

Section 11.715. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For physician services and related services including, but not limited to,
clinic and podiatry services, telemedicine services, physician

SB 1760 51

sponsored services and fees, laboratory and x-ray services,
asthma related services, diabetes prevention and obesity related
services, services provided by chiropractic physicians, and
family planning services under the MO HealthNet fee-for-
service program, and for a comprehensive chronic care risk
management program, and Major Medical Prior Authorization,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this
subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730,
11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825,
11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$209,696,054
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................402,039,085
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144)........................ 10,000
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)......................................1,427,081
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120)........................... 241,046

For payment of physician and related services to Certified Community
Behavioral Health Organizations (CCBHO), provided that
Applied Behavioral Analysis (ABA) services are included in the
CCBHO Prospective Payment System provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735,
11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830,
and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................56,613,853
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ............................... 50,432,832
Total............................................................$723,425,037

Section 11.720. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Program for All-Inclusive Care for Elderly (PACE), provided
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection
and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735,
11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830,
and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$6,948,776
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ............................... 12,880,193
Total.............................................................$19,828,969

SB 1760 52

Section 11.725. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For dental services under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service program,
including adult dental procedure codes (Tier 1-6), provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735,
11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830,
and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$5,711,429
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................10,277,456
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275).................................. 71,162
Total.............................................................$16,060,047

Section 11.730. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to third-party insurers, employers, or policy holders for
health insurance, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715,
11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775,
11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$138,296,315
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ............................... 270,491,167
Total............................................................$408,787,482

Section 11.735. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For funding long-term care services
For care in nursing facilities under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program and for contracted services to develop model policies
and practices that improve the quality of life for long-term care
residents, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within
this section

SB 1760 53
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$374,190,716
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................785,245,901
From Uncompensated Care Fund (1108)..................................58,516,478
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120)..........................6,992,981
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196).................9,500,000

For value-based incentive payments to nursing facilities provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within
this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................12,330,612
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................22,447,591

For home health for the elderly under the MO HealthNet fee-for-
service program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715,
11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775,
11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 843,255
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ...................................1,908,640
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275).................................. 159,305
Total.......................................................... $1,272,135,479

Section 11.740. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For funding long-term care services
For Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance payments as provided
by law
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ................................$240,741,466
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196)............. 132,240,896
Total............................................................$372,982,362

Section 11.745. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For rehabilitative and preventative care services ordered by a physician
and delivered by an Assisted Living Facility, provided one
hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ............................... 1
Total.....................................................................$2

SB 1760 54

Section 11.750. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For publicly funded long-term care services and support contracts and
funding supplemental payments for care in nursing facilities
under the nursing facility upper payment limit
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................$7,068,173
From Long Term Support UPL Fund (1724)............................ 3,882,595
Total.............................................................$10,950,768

Section 11.755. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For all other non-institutional services including, but not limited to,
rehabilitation, optometry, audiology, ambulance, non-
emergency medical transportation, durable medical equipment,
and eyeglasses under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program, and for rehabilitation services provided by residential
treatment facilities as authorized by the Children’s Division for
children in the care and custody of the Children’s Division,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this
subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730,
11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825,
11.830, and 11.840, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.455, 11.460, and
11.755
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$145,055,714
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................267,395,980
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196).................1,414,043
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)....................................... 194,881
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958).............10,491,302

For non-emergency medical transportation, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................20,753,261
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................37,956,673


SB 1760 55

For the federal share of MO HealthNet reimbursable non-emergency
medical transportation for public entities
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ............................... 2,555,469
Total............................................................$485,817,323

Section 11.760. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to providers of ground emergency medical transportation
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................$54,192,141
From Ground Emergency Medical Transport Fund (1422)................. 29,768,105
Total.............................................................$83,960,246

Section 11.765. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For complex rehabilitation technology items classified within the
Medicare program as of January 1, 2014 as durable medical
equipment that are individually configured for individuals to
meet their specific and unique medical, physical, and functional
needs and capacities for basic activities of daily living and
instrumental activities of daily living identified as medically
necessary to prevent hospitalization and/or institutionalization
of a complex needs patient; such items shall include, but not be
limited to, complex rehabilitation power wheelchairs, highly
configurable manual wheelchairs, adaptive seating and
positioning systems, and other specialized equipment such as
standing frames and gait trainers, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between this section and Sections 11.700,
11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770,
11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,529,833
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ............................... 9,332,971
Total.............................................................$13,862,804

Section 11.770. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division

SB 1760 56

For payment to comprehensive prepaid health care plans for the general
plan as provided by federal or state law or for payments to
programs authorized by the Frail Elderly Demonstration Project
Waiver as provided by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act
of 1990 (P.L.101-508, Section 4744) and by Section 208.152
(16), RSMo, provided that the department shall implement
programs or measures to achieve cost-savings through
emergency room services reform, and further provided that MO
HealthNet eligibles described in Section 501(a)(1)(D) of Title V
of the Social Security Act may voluntarily enroll in the
Managed Care Program, and further provided that the
Department shall direct its contracted actuary to develop an
Aged, Blind, and Disabled rate cell inside the MO HealthNet
Managed Care program to reflect the cost of those members
choosing to be enrolled in a managed care plan, and further
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this
subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730,
11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825,
11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$555,719,620
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ............................... 1,945,317,702
From Uncompensated Care Fund (1108)..................................33,848,436
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275).....................................18,590,380
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142)......................318,659,260
From Healthy Families Trust Fund (1625). ...............................14,435,373
From Life Sciences Research Trust Fund (1763). ..........................26,697,272
From Premium Fund (1885). ...........................................9,259,854
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958)..............2,892,711
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139).......................................................34,807,441

For supplemental payments to Tier 1 Safety Net Hospitals, or to any
affiliated physician group that provides physicians for any Tier
1 Safety Net Hospital, for physician and other healthcare
professional services as approved by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................44,621,663
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund

SB 1760 57

(1139).......................................................24,510,978

For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo., when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................34,404,881
From Ground Emergency Medical Transport Fund (1422)................. 19,485,118
Total.......................................................... $3,093,086,191

Section 11.775. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payment to a comprehensive prepaid health care plan for the
specialty plan as provided by federal or state law or for
payments to programs authorized by the Frail Elderly
Demonstration Project Waiver as provided by the Omnibus
Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-508, Section
4744) and by Section 208.152 (16), RSMo., and further
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this
section and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730,
11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825,
11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$135,581,554
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................294,791,886
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142).......................45,994,611
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958)............... 300,000
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139)........................................................6,221,543

For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo., when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ...................................2,333,455
From Ground Emergency Medical Transport Fund (1422)................. 1,321,546
Total............................................................$486,544,595

Section 11.780. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division

SB 1760 58
For hospital care under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service program,
graduate medical education, and for a comprehensive chronic
care risk management program, provided that the MO
HealthNet Division shall track payments to out-of-state
hospitals by location, and further provided the department seek
a waiver of the institutions for mental disease (IMD) exclusion
for inpatient mental health treatment for MO HealthNet
participants in psychiatric hospitals pursuant to Section 12003
of the 21st Century Cures Act with the state share through the
federal reimbursement allowance; and further provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735,
11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830,
and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$28,875,093
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................382,582,226
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142)......................112,631,293
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144)........................ 15,709

For rate increases for inpatient hospital psychiatric care
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................8,363,750
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................16,136,250
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142)......................... 500,000

For Safety Net Payments
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................22,950,583
From Healthy Families Trust Fund (1625). ............................ 30,365,444
Total............................................................$605,718,126

Section 11.785. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Transformation of Rural Community Health (ToRCH) Rural
Hospital Health Hub
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,750,000
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ...................................7,500,000
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142).................... 3,750,000
Total.............................................................$15,000,000

Section 11.790. To the Department of Social Services

SB 1760 59
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to Tier 1 Safety Net Hospitals for enhanced rates to
providers and to plan and develop a regional Barriers to Care
proposal while maximizing eligible costs for federal Medicaid
funds, utilizing current state and local funding sources as match
for services that are not currently matched with federal
Medicaid payments
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................$17,613,590
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139).................................................... 1,709,202
Total.............................................................$19,322,792

Section 11.795. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division,
For indirect medical education (IME) payments to public acute care
safety net hospitals who serve as the primary teaching hospitals
for the state’s two public medical schools, University of
Missouri-Columbia School of Medicine and University of
Missouri-Kansas City School of Medicine; payments from this
section are for the difference between IME payments paid under
the Diagnosis-Related Group (DRG) methodology and 100% of
allowable funds
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). .................................$12,721,240
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139).................................................... 6,987,862
Total.............................................................$19,709,102

Section 11.800. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
For Federally Qualified Health Centers (FQHCs)
For grants to Federally Qualified Health Centers
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $257,732

Section 11.805. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For Federally Qualified Health Centers (FQHCs)

SB 1760 60
For a grant program for a substance abuse prevention network for a
FQHC located in a county with more than two hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $500,000
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 125,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705)................... 550,000

For a grant program for a substance abuse prevention network
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 500,000
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610)......................................................... 125,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).............. 1,050,000
Total..............................................................$2,850,000

Section 11.810. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to technical assistance contractors under Section 330(l)
or 330(m) of the Public Health Services Act to assist FQHCs
with outreach and engagement of Medicaid beneficiaries
assigned to FQHCs, to address gaps in preventive services and
management of chronic conditions, and for incentive payments
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,918,645
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 1,918,645
Total..............................................................$3,837,290

Section 11.815. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For health homes, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$4,270,273
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................21,978,561
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142).................... 7,893,011
Total.............................................................$34,141,845

Section 11.820. To the Department of Social Services

SB 1760 61
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to hospitals under the Federal Reimbursement Allowance
Program including state costs to pay for an independent audit of
Disproportionate Share Hospital payments as required by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, for the expenses
of the Poison Control Center in order to provide services to all
hospitals within the state
For a continuation of the services provided through Medicaid
Emergency Psychiatric Demonstration as required by Section
208.152(16), RSMo.
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ................................$649,395,358
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142).................... 377,967,211
Total.......................................................... $1,027,362,569

Section 11.825. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For funding programs to enhance access to care for uninsured children
using fee-for-service, prepaid health plans, or other alternative
service delivery and reimbursement methodology approved by
the director of the Department of Social Services, provided that
families of children receiving services under this section shall
pay the following premiums to be eligible to receive such
services: zero percent on the amount of a family's income which
is less than or equal to 150 percent of the federal poverty level;
four percent on the amount of a family's income which is less
than or equal to 185 percent of the federal poverty level but
greater than 150 percent of the federal poverty level; eight
percent on the amount of a family's income which is less than or
equal to 225 percent of the federal poverty level but greater than
185 percent of the federal poverty level; fourteen percent on the
amount of a family's income which is less than or equal to 300
percent of the federal poverty level but greater than 225 percent
of the federal poverty level not to exceed five percent of total
income; families with an annual income of more than 300
percent of the federal poverty level are ineligible for this
program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this section and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840

SB 1760 62

From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$119,878,066
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159)......................................................424,931,150
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................18,375,949
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139)........................................................6,089,434
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142).......................16,430,704

For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo., when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159)........................................................2,539,590
From Ground Emergency Medical Transport Fund (1422)................. 860,410
Total............................................................$589,105,303

Section 11.830. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Show-Me Healthy Babies Program authorized by Section
208.662, RSMo, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715,
11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775,
11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$23,403,564
From Title XXI Children's Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159)......................................................116,618,782
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ...................................3,861,140
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139)........................................................1,279,507

From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142).................... 7,467,000
Total............................................................$152,629,993

Section 11.835. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division

SB 1760 63
For MO HealthNet services for the Department of Elementary and
Secondary Education under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $242,525
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ............................... 139,864,081
Total............................................................$140,106,606

Section 11.840. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For medical benefits for blind individuals ineligible for MO HealthNet
coverage who receive the Missouri Blind Pension cash grant,
provided that individuals under this section shall pay the
following premiums to be eligible to receive such services: zero
percent on the amount of a family's income which is less than
150 percent of the federal poverty level; four percent on the
amount of a family's income which is less than 185 percent of
the federal poverty level but greater than or equal to 150 percent
of the federal poverty level; eight percent of the amount on a
family's income which is less than 225 percent of the federal
poverty level but greater than or equal to 185 percent of the
federal poverty level; fourteen percent on the amount of a
family's income which is less than 300 percent of the federal
poverty level but greater than or equal to 225 percent of the
federal poverty level not to exceed five percent of total income;
families with an annual income equal to or greater than 300
percent of the federal poverty level are ineligible for this
program, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715,
11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775,
11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$24,530,527

Section 11.845. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For program distributions related to Section 36(c) of Article IV of the
Missouri Constitution
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$398,210,510

SB 1760 64

From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ..................................79,212,938
From Title XIX Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358).................... 4,239,533,093
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144)......................2,146,956
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196).................2,146,151
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958)............... 565,267
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142).......................62,919,733
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139)........................................................8,801,437

For supplemental payments to Tier 1 Safety Net Hospitals, or to any
affiliated physician group that provides physicians for any Tier
1 Safety Net Hospital, for physician and other healthcare
professional services as approved by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services
From Title XIX Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358).......................43,697,736
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139)........................................................4,855,304

For payments to the Department of Mental Health for Community
Psychiatric Rehabilitation (CPR) services, Comprehensive
Substance Abuse Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR)
services, Targeted Case Management (TCM) for behavioral
health services, and Certified Community Behavioral Health
Organizations (CCBHO) for MO HealthNet participants and the
uninsured
From Title XIX Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358)......................362,039,310
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139).......................................................40,226,590

For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo., when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XIX Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358).......................21,649,500
From Ground Emergency Medical Transport Fund (1422)................. 2,405,500
Total.......................................................... $5,271,543,183

Section 11.850. To the Department of Social Services

SB 1760 65
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund for the purpose of providing the state
match for Medicaid payments
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139).....................................................$137,074,165

Section 11.855. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to the Department of Mental Health for Community
Psychiatric Rehabilitation (CPR) services, Comprehensive
Substance Abuse Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR)
services, Targeted Case Management (TCM) for behavioral
health services, and Certified Community Behavioral Health
Organizations (CCBHO) for MO HealthNet participants and the
uninsured
From Title XIX - Federal Fund (1163). ................................$654,770,827
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139).................................................... 329,366,062
Total............................................................$984,136,889

Section 11.860. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For family planning and family planning-related services, pregnancy
testing, sexually transmitted disease testing and treatment,
including pap tests and pelvic exams, and follow-up services,
provided that none of the funds appropriated herein may be
paid, granted to, or expended to directly or indirectly fund
procedures or administrative functions of any clinic, physician's
office, or any other place or facility in which abortions are
performed or induced other than a hospital, or any affiliate of
any such clinic, physician's office, or place or facility in which
abortions are performed or induced other than a hospital, or for
performing, inducing, or assisting in the performance or
inducing of an abortion which is not necessary to save the life
of the mother, for encouraging a patient to have an abortion or
referring a patient for an abortion which is not necessary to save
the life of the mother, or developing or dispensing drugs,
chemicals, or devices intended to be used to induce an abortion
which is not necessary to save the life of the mother. Such

SB 1760 66

services shall be available to uninsured women who are at least
eighteen (18) to fifty-five (55) years of age with a family
Modified Adjusted Gross Income for the household size that
does not exceed two hundred and one percent (201%) of the
Federal Poverty Level (FPL) and who is a legal resident of the
state
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,871,711
From Department of Social Services Federal and Other Sources Fund
(1610).................................................... 1,208,096
Total..............................................................$3,079,807

Section 11.865. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$38,737,111

Section 11.870. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144)....................$38,737,111

Section 11.875. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$20,837,332

Section 11.880. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958)............$20,837,332

Section 11.885. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$718,701,378

Section 11.890. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund

SB 1760 67
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142).....................$718,701,378

Section 11.895. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................$210,950,510

Section 11.900. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196)..............$210,950,510

Section 11.905. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund in accordance with
Section 198.418.1, RSMo., to be used by the Department of
Health and Senior Services for conducting inspections and
surveys and providing training and technical assistance to
facilities licensed under the provisions of Chapter 198
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196)................$1,500,000

Section 11.910. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo., to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1
(cid:252)